Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
CHAPTER 7 Legislative Research Commission
7.120.
Statute revision functions of Commission — Records — Confidentiality of drafts of legislative proposals.

The Legislative Research Commission shall formulate, supervise, and execute plans and methods for the future revision, clarification, classification, codification, and arrangement of the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

The Commission shall prepare and submit to the General Assembly such consolidation, revision, and other matters relating to the statutes as can be completed from time to time.

The Commission shall keep in its office an accurate and complete record of all legislation enacted by the General Assembly and shall study same for the purpose of determining the intention and the effect thereof. The Commission shall advise and assist the members of the General Assembly in the preparation and revision of legislation and matters connected therewith. When preparing and revising legislation for members of the General Assembly, the Commission shall maintain the confidentiality of each item of legislation which it is requested to prepare, and of the fact that the request has been made, until the member or members of the General Assembly having made the request shall introduce the legislation at a regular or extraordinary session of the General Assembly or shall in writing authorize its publication by the Commission. The Commission shall, when requested by the General Assembly or either house thereof, report to the General Assembly on bills introduced, calling attention to their effect on existing legislation and to any deficiencies in their form.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 48, § 1; 1966, ch. 85, § 1(1), (6), (7); 1978, ch. 358, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1984, ch. 111, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 46, § 2, effective January 1, 1997.

7.122.
Comprehensive statute revision. [Repealed.]

7.123.
Effect of revisory act on other acts adopted at same session.

If any act to revise and correct the Kentucky Revised Statutes adopted during a session of the General Assembly:

Amends or repeals and reenacts a statute section also amended or repealed and reenacted by another act adopted at the same session, then effect shall be given to both acts insofar as there is no conflict in substance. In the event of a conflict in substance between the acts, the nonrevisory act prevails to the extent of the conflict;

Repeals an act amended by another act adopted at the same session, then such repeal has no effect;

Amends or repeals and reenacts a statute section repealed by another act adopted at the same session, the repeal of the section by the nonrevisory act prevails.

Nothing in any act to revise and correct the Kentucky Revised Statutes adopted by the General Assembly shall be construed to effect any substantive change in the statute law of Kentucky and if any substantive change appears to be effected it shall be disregarded and the law as it existed prior to the effective date of the revisory act shall be given full force and effect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 255, §§ 284, 285, effective June 16, 1996.

7.125.
Publication of court rules. [Repealed.]

7.130.
Advisory committee on statute revision. [Repealed.]

7.131.
Official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

The Legislative Research Commission shall maintain the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes in an electronic database that shall be used in bill drafting for the Kentucky General Assembly and made available to the public as provided by KRS

7.500

.

The official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes shall contain all permanent laws of a general nature that are in force in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

In maintaining the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the Commission may omit all laws of a private, local, or temporary nature, including laws for the appropriation of money, and memorials and joint and concurrent resolutions. The Commission shall omit the titles and enacting clauses of the several acts as well as repealing, emergency, and severability clauses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 46, § 1, effective January 1, 1997.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Articles, “Kentucky Legal Research on the Internet”, 86 Ky. L.J. 971 (1997-98).

7.132.
Designation of certified versions of KRS — Standards — Distribution to state law library.

In response to a written request from a publisher, the Commission may designate a version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes as a certified version if:

The version meets the requirements of KRS

7.134

; and

The publisher of the version enters into a written agreement with the Commission.

The Commission may furnish to the state law library, without cost, on request of the Chief Justice, a sufficient number of copies of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to enable the state law librarian to carry out duties imposed on him by law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 85, §§ 1(5), 3; 1976, ch. 62, § 1; 1984, ch. 111, § 14, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 46, § 3, effective January 1, 1997.

7.134.
Contents of certified versions of KRS — Format — Requirements for certificate.

Certified versions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes shall contain:

The Constitution of the United States;

The Constitution of this Commonwealth;

The text of all laws contained in the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes;

A full and accurate index of the statute laws and Constitution of this Commonwealth;

The rules of the Supreme Court of Kentucky, the Kentucky Rules of Civil Procedure, the Kentucky Rules of Criminal Procedure, and any other judicial materials specified by the Commission; and

Any annotations, historical notes, and other information that the Commission deems appropriate to include.

A certified version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes may be in a printed or electronic format and shall be updated in a manner and frequency acceptable to the Commission to provide prompt notice to its users of the texts of newly-created and newly-amended statutes, the repeals of existing statutes, and any technical corrections, renumberings, or notes issued by the Commission. If a publisher produces more than one (1) version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, a separate certification may be required for each version.

Each new complete certified version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes and each new volume, unit, supplement, supplemental pocket part, or electronic release of a certified version shall include a certificate issued by the director of the Legislative Research Commission and attested to by the reviser of statutes that the particular material being certified has been prepared in a manner acceptable to the Legislative Research Commission so as to ensure the identity of its text with the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 85, § 2(1), (2); 1976, ch. 62, § 2; 1996, ch. 46, § 4, effective January 1, 1997.

7.136.
Alterations permitted in maintaining official version of KRS.

The Commission, in maintaining the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, shall not alter the sense, meaning, or effect of any act of the General Assembly, but may:

Renumber sections and parts of sections of the acts of the General Assembly;

Change the wording of headnotes;

Divide or rearrange sections and parts of sections;

Change words when directed by law;

Change reference numbers to agree with renumbered chapters or sections, or to make corrections in reference numbers when sections referred to are repealed or amended and the correction can be made without change in the law;

Substitute the proper section or chapter numbers for the terms “this act,” “the preceding section,” and the like;

Change capitalization, spelling, and punctuation for the purpose of uniformity and consistency; and

Correct manifest clerical or typographical errors.

In maintaining the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the reviser of statutes may substitute the name of any agency, officer, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth or of a political subdivision whose name is changed by law or to which powers, duties, and responsibilities have been transferred by law, for the name which the agency, officer, or instrumentality previously used or of the agency which was previously vested with the same powers and charged with the same duties and responsibilities.

If any section or part of a section of a statute or of any act of the General Assembly is amended by more than one (1) act at the same session of the General Assembly, the Commission may incorporate in the statute the section as amended or altered by the several acts, if each of the amendments, changes, or alterations can be given effect and incorporated in the section in a manner which will make the section intelligible. If a conflict appears between any section amended in an act to revise and amend the Kentucky Revised Statutes and the same section in any other act adopted at the same session of the General Assembly, the change or alteration effected by the nonrevisory act shall be inserted in the section as incorporated in the statute publication.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 85, §§ 1(2), 2(3); 1966, ch. 255, § 282(1); 1984, ch. 111, § 15, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 431, § 1, effective April 13, 1992; 1996, ch. 46, § 5, effective January 1, 1997.

7.138.
Manner of amendment or repeal of KRS sections — Official or certified version to be used in judicial or administrative proceeding — Procedure in event of difference between official and certified versions.

Any section in the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes may be amended or repealed by reference to the section number, without reference to the legislative act from which it was compiled.

In any judicial or administrative proceeding, the text of any codified Kentucky statute which is submitted or cited by a party or upon which the court or the administrative officer or body relies shall be that text contained in the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes or in a certified version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes so designated pursuant to KRS

7.132

and bearing the certification provided for by KRS

7.134

.

In the event of a difference between the text of a statute as it appears in the official version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes and as it appears in a certified version of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, the text from the official version shall prevail unless, in response to a written inquiry, the Commission shall provide the court or the administrative officer or body in writing with a statement that the text in the official version is being corrected and with the text of that statute as corrected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 85, § 1(3), (4); 1984, ch. 111, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 88, § 89, effective July 1, 1992; 1992, ch. 431, § 2, effective April 13, 1992; ch. 431, § 3, effective July 1, 1992; 1994, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 46, § 6, effective January 1, 1997.

7.140.
Reviser of statutes — Appointment — Duties.

The execution of the functions provided for in KRS

7.120

,

7.131

,

7.132

,

7.134

,

7.136

,

7.138

, and this section shall be carried out by a reviser of statutes, who shall be appointed by the Commission upon recommendation of the director. The reviser may be removed only upon the approval of the Legislative Research Commission. The reviser shall be learned in the law and shall be either a member of the bar of Kentucky or a person who has had at least two (2) years of responsible experience in statute revision work.

The reviser of statutes shall perform any additional duties required by the Commission. He shall cooperate with and assist the director of the Legislative Research Commission to the fullest extent practicable in the performance of his duties and on request of the director shall draft bills, provide legal research and other assistance, and perform such other duties as do not substantially interfere with the performance of his duties under KRS

7.120

,

7.131

,

7.132

,

7.134

,

7.136

,

7.138

, and this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 48, § 3; 1966, ch. 85, § 4; 1984, ch. 111, § 17, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 46, § 7, effective January 1, 1997; 2001, ch. 136, § 4, effective June 21, 2001.

7.150.
Duties of commission concerning filing, publication and distribution of administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

7.160.
Duty of commission to study Constitution; recommendations; reports; assist constitutional convention. [Repealed.]

7.170.
Constitution revision assembly. [Repealed.]

7.180.
Representative council. [Repealed.]

7.200.
Commission on Race and Access to Opportunity.

The Commission on Race and Access to Opportunity is hereby established within the legislative department of state government. The purpose of the commission shall be to conduct studies and research on issues where disparities may exist across the sectors of educational equity, child welfare, health, economic opportunity, juvenile justice, criminal justice, and any other sectors that are deemed relevant in an effort to identify areas of improvement in providing services and opportunities for minority communities.

The commission shall be composed of the following thirteen (13) members:

One (1) member appointed by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives from a list of three (3) names provided by the Prosecutors Advisory Council;

Four (4) members of the Senate, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Senate President, and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Minority Floor Leader;

Four (4) members of the House of Representatives, two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House, and two (2) of whom shall be appointed by the House Minority Floor Leader; and

Four (4) members from the private and nonprofit sectors, universities, or local governments who have expertise in social policy related to education, health, economic development, or the law and who shall be appointed for up to two (2) consecutive, three (3) year terms by the following:

One (1) shall be appointed by the Senate President;

One (1) shall be appointed by the Senate Minority Floor Leader;

One (1) shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House; and

One (1) shall be appointed by the House Minority Floor Leader.

The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall each appoint one (1) co-chair of the commission from among that chamber’s members appointed to the commission.

Any vacancy which may occur in the membership of the commission shall be filled by the appointing authority who made the original appointment.

The commission shall have the authority to:

Hold monthly meetings during the interim meeting period of the General Assembly;

Seek comment, testimony, documents, records, or other information from various government agencies and organizations representing the public to address existing and potential barriers to minority success and empowerment; and

Provide research-driven policy proposals and actionable items when areas of improvement are identified.

A majority of the entire membership of the commission shall constitute a quorum.

The Legislative Research Commission shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the employment of personnel necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

The commission shall publish and submit an annual report to the Legislative Research Commission with recommendations on any potential legislative or administrative actions with respect to their findings.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 146, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.